Nebraska, session 109, LB496.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB496 LB496
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 60-6,111, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
60-6,111 (1) Any person who rides an animal or drives an animal-
drawn vehicle, a farm tractor, or an implement of husbandry upon a
roadway shall be granted all of the rights and shall be subject to all of
the duties made applicable to the driver of a vehicle by the Nebraska
Rules of the Road except those provisions of the rules which by their
very nature can have no application.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, whenever
Whenever the slowness of such animal, animal-drawn vehicle, farm tractor,
or implement of husbandry is obstructing the normal flow of traffic, the
rider or driver shall drive to the nearest available shoulder of the
highway and allow traffic to pass.
(3)(a) For purposes of this subsection, livestock means any horse,
mule, donkey, cattle, swine, sheep, or goat.
(b) Any person who is operating a motor vehicle upon a highway
shall:
(i) Use caution when approaching or passing any person who is
leading or herding livestock on the highway;
(ii) Promptly stop such motor vehicle if a person who is leading or
driving livestock upon a highway gives a distress signal to the motor
vehicle by raising a hand. This subdivision (3)(a)(ii) does not apply if
moving the motor vehicle is necessary to avoid an accident;
(iii) Turn off the engine of such motor vehicle if requested by a
person who is leading or driving livestock upon a highway; and
(iv) Yield the right of way to livestock being led or driven on a
highway.
Sec. 2. Original section 60-6,111, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-